Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-430
Habitat stamps; authorized agents; fees; remit.

Any person, firm, or corporation authorized as an agent to sell the stamps under sections 37-426 to 37-433 and collect the fees therefor shall remit the fees for the stamps to the commission in the manner and at the times prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 12;

Laws 1983, LB 174, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-216.06;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 140;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 30.